Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1509
Return of custody; removal from foster care; procedures.

(1) Notwithstanding any other state law to the contrary, whenever a final decree of adoption of an Indian child has been vacated or set aside or the adoptive parents voluntarily consent to the termination of their parental rights to the child, a biological parent or prior Indian custodian may petition for return of custody and the court shall grant such petition unless there is a showing, in a proceeding subject to the provisions of section 43-1505, that such return of custody is not in the best interests of the Indian child.

(2) Whenever an Indian child is removed from a foster care home or institution for the purpose of further foster care, preadoptive, or adoptive placement, such placement shall be in accordance with the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, except in the case in which an Indian child is being returned to the parent or Indian custodian from whose custody the child was originally removed.

Laws 1985, LB 255, § 9;

Laws 2015, LB566, § 13.

The lower standard of proof under subsection (3) of section 43-279.01 for the termination of parental rights to non-Indian children, as opposed to the higher standard of proof under the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act does not violate the equal protection rights of parents of non-Indian children. In re Interest of Phoenix L. et al., 270 Neb. 870, 708 N.W.2d 786 (2006).